test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taei31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täi: # Noun (31) täi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    täi+N+Sg+Nom: täi
    täi+N+Sg+Gen: täi
    täi+N+Sg+Par: täid
    täi+N+Sg+Ill: [täihte, täihe, täide]
    täi+N+Sg+Ine: [täin, täih, täihn]
    täi+N+Sg+Ela: täist
    täi+N+Sg+All: täile
    täi+N+Sg+Ade: täil
    täi+N+Sg+Abl: täilt
    täi+N+Sg+Tra: täis
    täi+N+Sg+Ter: täiniq
    täi+N+Sg+Abe: täildäq
    täi+N+Sg+Com: [täigaq, täiga]
    täi+N+Pl+Nom: täiq
    täi+N+Pl+Gen: [täie, täide]
    täi+N+Pl+Par: [täie, täisit]
    täi+N+Pl+Ill: [täihte, täihe, täide]
    täi+N+Pl+Ine: [täen, täeh, täehn, täien, täieh, täiehn]
    täi+N+Pl+Ela: [täest, täiest]
    täi+N+Pl+All: [täele, täiele]
    täi+N+Pl+Ade: [täel, täiel]
    täi+N+Pl+Abl: [täelt, täielt]
    täi+N+Pl+Tra: [täes, täies]
    täi+N+Pl+Ter: [täeniq, täieniq]
    täi+N+Pl+Abe: [täeldäq, täieldäq, täeldä, täieldä]
    täi+N+Pl+Com: [täiegaq, täidega]
